rus-rules.xfst
! Nikolay Vorontsov, Russian Nouns, 7 Jan. 2023

clear stack

read lexc rus.lexc

define Lexicon ;

regex Lexicon ;

echo <<Russian Vocabulary Nouns Defined>>

echo <<Defining Phonological-Writing Rules>>

define CONS [ й | ц | к | н | г | ш | щ | з | х | ф | в | п | р | л | д | ж | ч | с | м | т | б ] ;

define RuleKGH	ы -> и || [ к | г | х ] %^ _ ; 

define RuleCHZHSCH ы -> и ,
		   я -> а ,
		   ю -> у || [ ч | ж | ш | щ ] %^ _ ;

define RuleOGenii e -> i || i %^ _ ; ! morpheme boundary to clean-up later

define BeglyjOE		%^О -> о ,
			%^Е -> е || _ CONS %^ .#. ;

define BeglyjRemove 	%^О -> 0 ,
			%^Е -> 0 ;

define CleanUp %^ -> 0 ;

read regex Lexicon .o. RuleKGH .o. RuleCHZHSCH .o. RuleOGenii .o. BeglyjOE .o. BeglyjRemove .o. CleanUp ;
